Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 17. Mortgage Loan Originators.
§ 6.2-1716.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The Commission may suspend or revoke any license issued under this chapter based upon:

Any ground sufficient for denial of the issuance of a license under this chapter;

Any violation of the provisions of this chapter or regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant thereto, or a violation of any other law or regulation applicable to the conduct of the licensee’s licensed activities;

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a judgment against a licensee involving fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit;

Entry of a federal or state administrative order against a licensee for violation of any law or any regulation applicable to the conduct of his licensed activities;

Refusal to permit an investigation or examination by the Commission;

Failure to pay any fee or assessment imposed by this chapter;

Failure to comply with any order of the Commission; or

Failure to maintain registration with, or a unique identifier from, the Registry.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.17; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1717.
Filing of written report with Commissioner; events affecting a licensee.

Within 15 days of becoming aware of the occurrence of any of the events listed below, a licensee shall file a written report with the Commissioner describing such event:

The institution of revocation or suspension proceedings against the licensee by any state or other governmental authority;

The denial of the opportunity to engage in business by any state or other governmental authority;

Any felony indictment of the licensee;

Any felony conviction of the licensee; and

Such other events as the Commission may determine and identify by regulation.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.18; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1718.
Notice of proposed suspension or revocation.

The Commission may not revoke or suspend the license of any licensee under this chapter unless it has given the licensee 21 days’ notice in writing of the reasons for the proposed revocation or suspension and has given the licensee an opportunity to introduce evidence and be heard. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the licensee’s last address on the Commission’s records and shall state with particularity the basis for the contemplated action. Within 14 days of mailing the notice, the licensee may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not suspend or revoke the license except based upon findings made at such hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Title 12.1.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.19; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-1719.
Civil penalties.

The Commission may impose a civil penalty not exceeding $2,500 upon any individual required to be licensed under this chapter who it determines, in proceedings commenced in accordance with the Commission’s Rules, has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or any other law or regulation applicable to the licensee’s activities. For the purposes of this section, each separate violation shall be subject to the civil penalty herein prescribed, and each day that an unlicensed individual engages in the business of a mortgage loan originator shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.20; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and substituted “individual engages in the business of a mortgage loan originator” for “individual acts as or holds himself out to the general public as, a mortgage loan originator” in the second sentence.

§ 6.2-1720.
Regulations; agreements between Commission and Registry.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulations, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of their content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to present evidence and be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules.

The Commission shall, to the extent practicable, include in any written memorandum of understanding or other written agreement between the Commission and the Registry provisions substantially similar to the following:

Any organization serving as the administrator of the Registry or any officer or employee of any such entity shall implement and maintain an information security program that meets or exceeds federal and state standards pursuant to §

18.2-186.6

and that complies with the regulation guidelines promulgated under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.) for safeguarding personal information of mortgage loan originators and applicants;

The Registry shall not under any circumstances disclose to any third party any information pertaining to any pending or incompletely adjudicated regulatory matters;

The Registry shall develop, as requested by the Commission, a mortgage loan originator licensing test that may be limited to specific products and services; and

The Registry shall provide to the Commission summary statistical information by March 31 of each year relating to loan originator examinations taken by applicants for a mortgage loan originator license in the Commonwealth during the preceding calendar year.

Except as otherwise provided in the Act or this chapter, any requirement under federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided to the Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to the Registry. Such information and material may be shared with all state and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by federal or state law. In addition:

Information or material that is subject to privilege or confidentiality under this subsection shall not be subject to: (i) disclosure under any federal or state law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of the federal government or the Commonwealth or (ii) subpoena or discovery, or admission into evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with respect to any privilege held by the Registry with respect to such information or material, the individual to whom such information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the discretion of such individual, that privilege;

Any provision of the laws of the Commonwealth relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or material described in this subsection that is inconsistent with this subsection shall be superseded by the requirements of this subsection to the extent that such provision provides less confidentiality or a weaker privilege; and

This subsection shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan originators that is included in the Registry for access by the public.

The Commission shall:

Annually review the proposed budget, fees, and audited financial statements of the Registry;

Annually, to the extent practicable, report to the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor on the operations of the Registry, including compliance with its established protocols for securing and safeguarding personal information in the Registry;

To the extent practicable, prepare, publicly announce, and publish a report, by no later than July 1 of each year, that summarizes statistical test results and demographic information to be prepared by the Registry or its test administrator; and

Report violations of this chapter, any enforcement actions thereunder, and other relevant information to the Registry on a regular basis.

History.

2009, cc. 273, 453, § 6.1-431.21; 2010, c. 794; 2012, cc. 52, 187.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the House Committee on Labor and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “the House and Senate Committees on Commerce and Labor” in subdivision D 2. March 10, 2021.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 52 and 187 are identical, and redesignated former subdivisions B 5 and B 6 as the present introductory paragraph of subsection C and subdivision C 1; redesignated former subsections C through E as present subdivisions C 2 and C 3, and subsection D; in the introductory paragraph of C, substituted “in the Act or this chapter, any requirement under federal” for “in § 1512 of the Act, the requirements under any federal” near the beginning of the first sentence, and added “In addition:” at the end thereof; substituted ”this subsection” for “§

6.2-101

” in the introductory clause of subdivision C 1; rewrote subdivision C 2; substituted “July 1” for “May 1” in subdivision D 3; added subdivision D 4; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-1721.
Cease and desist orders.

If the Commission determines that any mortgage loan originator required to be licensed hereunder has violated any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the Commission may, upon 21 days’ notice in writing, order such person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the provisions of this chapter. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the address of record in the Registry for such mortgage loan originator and shall state the grounds for the contemplated action.

Within 14 days after the mailing of the notice, the person named therein may file with the clerk of the Commission a written request for a hearing. If a hearing is requested, the Commission shall not issue a cease and desist order except based upon findings made at the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Title 12.1. The Commission may enforce compliance with any such order issued under this section by imposition and collection of such penalties as may be prescribed by Commission regulations.

History.

2011, c. 435.